Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-1120.25
Emergency; Governor; direct assumption of control.

In the event of an emergency, the Governor may direct the assumption of control over all or part of the communications system pursuant to the Emergency Management Act.

Laws 1967, c. 572, § 11, p. 1884;

R.R.S.1943, § 81-1120.11;

Laws 1975, LB 427, § 16;

Laws 1996, LB 43, § 51.

Emergency Management Act, see section 81-829.36.